Louisiana, session 2026, HB1072.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 48:196(C) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§196. State Highway Improvement Fund
* * *
C. Monies appropriated from the fund shall be used exclusively by the
Department of Transportation and Development office of Louisiana Highway
Construction for funding projects for any road which is part of the state highway
system but not part of the federal system and, thus, is ineligible for federal highway
funding assistance. Such projects shall include but not be limited to design,
preventive maintenance, rehabilitation, restoration, and improvement of the
state-maintained system of roads. In addition, these funds may be used to complete
all of the preconstruction activities such as planning, survey, design, engineering,
right-of-way acquisition, and utility relocations associated with such projects. These
funds may also be used to compensate a parish or municipal governing authority for
the acceptance of ownership of any road on the state highway system that is not part
of the federal system pursuant to R.S. 48:224.1.
* * *
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1072 ENROLLED
Section 2. R.S. 49:220.51(D) and 220.52(C)(2) and (4) are hereby amended and
reenacted and R.S. 49:220.51(E) and 220.54 are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§220.51. Office of Louisiana Highway Construction; creation
* * *
D.(1) The office of Louisiana Highway Construction is hereby authorized
to enter into agreements with the Department of Transportation and Development for
the design, construction, remediation, rehabilitation, or replacement of any segment
of a federal-aid highway, provided that no federal funds are used for the work and
to the extent permitted by federal law.
(2) The agreement shall delineate the specific scope of work, funding
allocations, and regulatory compliance standards required for the administration of
federal-aid highway projects.
D. E. For purposes of this Part, the term "office" shall mean the office of
Louisiana Highway Construction.
§220.52. Powers, duties, and responsibilities
* * *
C. The office of Louisiana Highway Construction may:
* * *
(2) Receive Solicit, receive, and administer interagency transfers, state
general fund allocations, or any other sources of funding allowed under the law
necessary to support the delivery of its functions.
* * *
(4) The office of Louisiana Highway Construction may engage Engage in
and utilize emergency procurement procedures for any purpose until January 1, 2026
December 31, 2027.
* * *
§220.54. Emergency authority
A. In cases of emergency where the emergency has been certified by the
executive director, the requirements of R.S. 48:252 et seq. may be waived by the
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1072 ENROLLED
executive director to the minimum extent necessary to meet the demands of the
emergency.
B. Upon the recommendation of the executive director, emergency purchases
of commodities, materials, supplies, equipment and miscellany, or purchases or
leases of noncompetitive or patented articles, devices, equipment, or commodities
may be negotiated and made without requesting bids, except that essential documents
authorizing these purchases or leases shall have written on their face the explicit
reasons supporting the necessity for these leases or purchases.
C. When sections of nonfederal aid highway, the component parts thereof,
or any facility under the control of the office are damaged, obstructed, or destroyed
by flood or other disaster, so as to impede or interrupt the normal use of the
nonfederal aid highway or facility, the executive director may make, or authorize to
be made, without requesting bids, such emergency purchases as are required to
temporarily repair the highway or facility until permanent repairs can be made. The
temporary repairs shall be held to minimum necessities and planning shall
immediately begin for the permanent rehabilitation of the highway or facility.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
of the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.